District of Columbia statutes.
3-106

Analysis of correctional impact.

Any recommendations by the Commission for regulatory changes or legislative amendments relating to crime, sentencing, or correctional matters shall take into consideration existing correctional and supervisory resources, including the availability of intermediate sanctions, and shall be accompanied by an assessment of the impact, if any, on the size of the District’s correctional and supervised offender population resulting from such change. The Commission shall not recommend such changes unless it has made an assessment that the costs of a recommended change would be commensurate with the benefits to criminal justice administration, without regard to the identity of the particular governmental body responsible for financing the correctional facilities or services at issue.

Oct. 16, 1998, D.C. Law 12-167, § 7, 45 DCR 5180
1981 Ed., § 2-4206.
This section is referenced in § 42-3401.01.